Utah statutes.
59-7-206.   Offsets against tax.

There shall be offset against the tax imposed by  this part for any period the amount of any tax imposed on the taxpayer under Section 59-7-104 for the same period.  In the event that taxes, interest, and penalties have been or shall be assessed against, paid by, or collected from a taxpayer under Section 59-7-201, which assessment, payment, or collection should have been made under Section 59-7-104, such taxes, interest, and penalties shall be considered as having been assessed, paid, or collected under Section 59-7-104 as of the dates they were made.



Amended by Chapter 169, 1993 General Session

